North Dakota, session 69, HB1536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - NATIVE
AMERICAN HISTORY CURRICULUM FUNDING - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,500,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of implementing a
Native American history curriculum, pursuant to chapter 15.1-21, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate:
a. Curriculum development funding of $600,000 for the development of curriculum
materials in collaboration with representatives of federally recognized tribes in
North Dakota, educators, and curriculum experts;
b. Teacher training funding of $300,000 for professional development programs to
train teachers on effectively integrating Native American history and culture into
the curriculum;
c. Educational material and resource funding of $500,000 for the procurement and
distribution of textbooks, digital content, and multimedia tools tailored to the new
curriculum requirements; and
Page No. 1 25.1020.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. Administrative oversight funding of $100,000 for the department of public
instruction to monitor compliance, provide guidance, and ensure successful
statewide implementation.
3. The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a Native American curriculum
advisory committee comprised of tribal leaders, cultural experts, and educators to
oversee and guide the development of the curriculum. The superintendent of public
instruction may contract with regional education associations, the North Dakota
university system, and tribal colleges as needed for assistance. The committee shall
focus on:
a. Investing in kindergarten through grade twelve education for Native American
youth to yield economic and social benefits positively impacting both individuals
and the state; and
b. Offering quality education and essential support to address and mitigate issues
such as addiction, poverty, and suicide, resulting in a more stable and prosperous
society and growing the workforce in the state.
4. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and provide ongoing teacher
support, including access to professional learning communities for knowledge sharing,
online and in-person training opportunities, and regular updates on best practices in
teaching Native American history and culture.
5. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure equitable access to resources
and materials, particularly for rural and underfunded schools, to implement the
curriculum effectively.
6. The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislative management
before August 31, 2026, regarding progress on curriculum development and
implementation, participation in teacher training programs, and feedback from schools
and tribal representatives on the effectiveness of the support mechanisms.
Page No. 2 25.1020.02000